New Mexico, session 2026, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to develop a pregnancy and parenting resource website and hotline that provides information on social services, financial assistance, adoption services, pregnancy and parenting information, planning guidance, care centers and other available public and private resources for expectant families and new parents. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.